Utah statutes.
78B-3-204.   Effect of failure to appoint registered agent -- Service of process upon nonresident.

If a nonresident person doing business fails to appoint a registered agent within the state in accordance with Title 16, Chapter 17, Model Registered Agents Act, service of process may be made by serving any person employed by or acting as an agent for the nonresident.



Amended by Chapter 43, 2010 General Session

